California, session 20252026, SB478.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 52073.4 is added to the Education Code, to read:52073.4. (a) On or before July 1, 2026, the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence and the Superintendent shall select an applicant county office of education to serve as a Statewide School Library Lead to work collaboratively with the state board, the department, the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence, other lead agencies in the statewide system of support, and state and regional education stakeholders to establish library and literacy services that support the statewide system of support. The selected county office of education shall employ at least one fully credentialed teacher librarian. The statewide school library lead’s duties shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:(1) Enhancing the state’s investment in literacy and aligning those efforts with the California Comprehensive State Literacy Plan.(2) Working collaboratively with Local Literacy Lead Agencies, the California Dyslexia Initiative, Comprehensive Literacy State Development Grant recipients, Learning Acceleration System Grant recipients, the California SUMS (Scaling Up Multi-Tiered System of Support Statewide) Initiative, and Reading Instruction and Intervention Grant recipients.(3) Working directly with local educational agencies to build capacity to develop excellent school library services and accelerate literacy and learning, including coordinating support, providing direct technical assistance, and delivering professional learning.(4) Working with local and regional entities to facilitate the integration of media and information literacy into the curriculum, scale up collaboration and coteaching with teacher librarians, and promote the role of the Model School Library Standards for California Public Schools in preparing a globally competent workforce.(5) Working with local and regional entities to promote school libraries as safe spaces that create a positive school climate, champion intellectual freedom, and support social and emotional learning, mindfulness, and well-being.(6) Working with local and regional entities to engage with families and communities to better synthesize, integrate, and extend literacy programs in a coherent and comprehensive manner.(7) Providing support for local educational agencies, subject matter projects across the state, the 21st Century California Leadership Academy, the California Community Schools Partnership Program: Regional Technical Assistance Center, and the Statewide System of Support for Expanded Learning.(b) For purposes of this section, “local educational agencies” means school districts, county offices of education, and charter schools.(c) The implementation of this section shall be contingent upon an appropriation for these purposes in the annual Budget Act or another statute.